District of Columbia statutes.
4-561.04

Independent expert consultant.

(a)

By December 1, 2014, the OVS shall retain an independent expert consultant.

(b)

The consultant shall be selected by the Office of Police Complaints, with input from the Victim Assistance Network, subject to final approval by the OVS.

(c)

The consultant shall be retained for a period of one year, with the option for the OVS to renew that contract for a second year.

(d)

The consultant selected shall have current and recognized expertise in the areas of law enforcement, advocacy, and medical best practices, policy and procedure development, sexual assault crimes, and the investigation or prosecution of sexual assault.

History

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 204, 61 DCR 5913